South Dakota, session 2026, HB1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 38-17-14 be AMENDED:
38-17-14. Any person owning or leasing and operating farm machinery to process
a crop has a lien from the date of operation on all grain threshed or combined; corn
shelled, husked or shredded; silage cut; seeds hulled; or agricultural products baled,
mowed, ground, raked, or pulverized by the person for the value of the services.
Section 2. That § 38-17-15 be AMENDED:
38-17-15. Any person entitled to a lien under § 38-17-14 shall perfect the lien as
provided in chapter 57A-9 and in this section. Any financing statement filed to perfect the
lien must contain or have attached to it the following information:
(1) The name and address of the owner or lessee and operator claiming the lien;
(2) The name and address of the person for whom a service specified in § 38-17-14
was performed;
(3) The amount due for the service;
(4) The amount of grain, seed, hay, silage, or other agricultural product covered by
the lien;
(5) The place where the grain, seed, hay, silage, or other agricultural product is
located;
(6) The date on which the service was commenced; and
(7) The date on which the service was completed.
After making oath to the correctness of the statement, the person shall file the
statement electronically with the secretary of state. The filing serves as notice of the lien,
to all, including purchasers and encumbrancers, subsequent to the date of the filing.

26.263.13 2 1111
To perfect the lien, the financing statement must be filed within sixty days of the
date the processing of the crop was finished. At the time the financing statement is filed,
the lienholder shall provide a copy of the financing statement to the person for whom the
work was done.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 38-17:
If the person for whom the processing pursuant to § 38-17-14 was done desires
to sell or consign the grain, seed, hay, silage, or other agricultural product, before the
time to perfect the lien has expired, the person must notify the consignee or purchaser
that the debt for the threshing, combining, shelling, husking, shredding, cutting, hulling,
baling, mowing, grinding, raking, or pulverizing has not been paid, and the lien created
under § 38-17-14 applies to the purchase price paid by the purchaser or consignee.
If the agricultural product covered by the lien pursuant to § 38-17-14 is sold or
consigned with the written consent of the person entitled to a lien, within sixty days after
the date of the completion of the processing and no financing statement has been filed,
the lien does not attach to the agricultural product covered by the lien pursuant to § 38-
17-14, or to the purchase proceeds, unless the person entitled to the lien notifies the
purchaser in writing of the lien before the purchase.
Section 4. That § 38-17-16 be AMENDED:
38-17-16. Any lien under § 38-17-14 has priority over all other liens and
encumbrances upon the grain threshed or combined; corn shelled, husked or shredded;
silage cut; seeds hulled; or agricultural products baled, mowed, ground, raked, or
pulverized, if filed within sixty days from the day on which the processing of the crop was
completed.
A lien created under §§ 38-17-14 to 38-17-18, inclusive, must be treated as an
agricultural lien, as provided in chapter 57A-9, and may be enforced in the manner and
form provided for the enforcement of secured transactions, except that the action to
enforce the lien must be commenced within sixty days after the filing of the financing
statement.
If the lien claimant does not commence an action to enforce the lien within sixty
days of filing the financing statement, the lien is terminated, and the person for whom the
processing was done may cause the financing statement to be expunged from the record
by filing a termination statement, together with a sworn statement that no action to
HB1111 ENROLLED

26.263.13 3 1111
enforce the lien has been commenced within sixty days of the filing of the lien claimant's
financing statement.
The fee for filing, amending, or releasing the lien is as set forth in § 57A-9-525.
The provisions of § 54-13-10 do not apply to liens created under §§ 38-17-14 to
38-17-18, inclusive.
Section 5. That § 38-17-19 be AMENDED:
38-17-19. Any person having a lien under the provisions of §§ 38-17-3 to 38-17-
18, inclusive, may foreclose the same under the provisions of chapter 57A-9.
Section 6. The 2025 Session Laws, chapter 166, §§ 1 to 6, inclusive, are superseded as of
July 1, 2026.
Section 7. Sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this Act are effective beginning July 1, 2027.
HB1111 ENROLLED

26.263.13 4 1111
An Act to modify the requirements for obtaining an agricultural processor's lien.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1111
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1111 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1111 ENROLLED